Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-947
University of Nebraska Medical Center; health-related programs; primary responsibility.

The University of Nebraska Medical Center shall continue to be the primary unit within the University of Nebraska for programs in the health-related disciplines. There shall be no duplication of administrative responsibility for any health-related program among units of the university.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 31.